Vermont statutes. Title 5 Aeronautics and Surface Transportation Generally
Subchapter 8. Railroad Police

§ 3755.
Commissions.

Upon petition of a person or corporation owning or operating a railroad, the Commissioner of Public Safety may, subject to the provisions of section 3757 of this subchapter, commission any employees of the railroad as the person or corporation designates to act as police officers in and upon the premises and equipment owned, managed, or used by a railroad, shall issue commissions to the employees so commissioned, and shall have the authority to rescind such commissions.

HISTORY:

Added

1981, No. 104

, § 1; amended

2013, No. 141

(Adj. Sess.), § 14, eff. July 1, 2015.

§ 3756.
Oath of office.

Each police officer so commissioned shall, before entering upon the duties of his or her office, take an oath of office administered by the Commissioner of Public Safety or his or her designee.

HISTORY:

Added

1981, No. 104

, § 1.

§ 3757.
Qualifications.

Persons commissioned pursuant to section 3755 of this subchapter shall be subject to minimum training standards established by rule of the Vermont Criminal Justice Council pursuant to 20 V.S.A. chapter 151.

HISTORY:

Added

1981, No. 104

, § 1; amended

2013, No. 141

(Adj. Sess.), § 14, eff. July 1, 2015.

§ 3758.
Powers.

Railroad police commissioned pursuant to this subchapter shall have the authority to act as police in and upon the premises and equipment owned, managed, or used by a railroad, and in all cases in which the rights of the employing or another railroad are involved, to exercise within this State all the powers of a law enforcement officer, including the powers of arrest and the carrying of firearms.

HISTORY:

Added

1981, No. 104

, § 1.

§ 3759.
Arrest; place of arraignment and trial.

When a criminal offense occurs on a moving train, arraignment and trial of any suspected offender shall take place in the county or territorial unit in which the offense occurred. When arrest and continued custody by railroad police are necessary and allowed by the Vermont Rules of Criminal Procedure, railroad police may detain a person arrested on a moving train until the next regular stop for the train on which they are traveling. The person shall then be removed from the train and delivered to the appropriate authorities.

HISTORY:

Added

1981, No. 104

, § 1.

§ 3760.
Carrying of badge.

Railroad police commissioned pursuant to this subchapter shall, when on duty, carry a badge with the words “Railroad Police” or “Railway Police,” and the name of the employing railroad inscribed thereon. The badge shall be worn in plain view when the police officer is in uniform. The police shall also carry, when on duty, an identification card issued by the employing railroad.

HISTORY:

Added

1981, No. 104

, § 1.

§ 3761.
Compensation; liability of employer.

The compensation and cost of training, including minimum basic training, of railroad police shall be paid by the person or corporation upon whose petition they are appointed. The person or corporation shall be liable to parties aggrieved by the official misconduct of the railroad police to the same extent as they are for the torts of other agents and employees of the railroad. The State of Vermont shall not be liable for the acts or omissions of railroad police appointed under this subchapter.

HISTORY:

Added

1981, No. 104

, § 1.

§ 3762.
Reciprocity.

In order to more effectively carry out the purposes of this subchapter, the Governor of this State, referred to as the empowering state, may enter into a reciprocal agreement with the governor of any other state, referred to as the reciprocal state, empowering railroad police, subject to any regulations prescribed under such agreement, with the right to perform any police function that can be lawfully exercised by a police officer of the reciprocal state relating to the detection and apprehension of any person committing an offense against the empowering or the reciprocal state, but only to the extent that the offense is committed on or against property owned, operated, or maintained by the employing or another railroad.

HISTORY:

Added

1981, No. 104

, § 1.

§ 3763.
Termination of authority.

Upon termination of employment as a railroad police officer of any person commissioned pursuant to this subchapter, the person’s commission shall be automatically rescinded and his or her powers as a police officer shall terminate. Within 10 days after the termination, the employing railroad shall file a notice of the termination with the Commissioner of Public Safety and the Vermont Criminal Justice Council. The State of Vermont shall not be responsible for the supervision, discipline, or decision to terminate the employment of persons commissioned as railroad police officers under this subchapter.

HISTORY:

Added

1981, No. 104

, § 1; amended

2013, No. 141

(Adj. Sess.), § 14, eff. July 1, 2015.